Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1048.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Coconino county; juvenile services The sum of $36,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration for distribution to Coconino county for eighty percent of the total cost of constructing and purchasing equipment for a new juvenile court services facility and converting the existing juvenile detention center into a detox, sobriety and crisis recovery center.